Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 7.5
MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1992, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1992, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For article, "Voting Under

C

olorado's Mail Ballot Election Act", see 21

C

olo. Law. 941 (1992).

Section

PART 1 MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS

PART 2 COUNTING MAIL BALLOTS